Washington statutes.
RCW 18.280.180

Reciprocity.

Persons licensed as home inspectors in other states may become licensed as home inspectors under this chapter as long as the other state has licensing requirements that meet or exceed those required under this chapter and the person seeking a license under this chapter passes the Washington portion of the exam under RCW 18.280.080.

[ 2008 c 119 s 18.]